Wyoming, session 2025, HB0208.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) The federal government, its agencies and
other entities acting on behalf of the federal government
have conducted or will conduct geoengineering experiments
HB0208

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0247
by intentionally disbursing chemicals and other substances
into the atmosphere. These geoengineering experiments may
be occurring within the state of Wyoming;

(ii) The risks to human health and environmental
safety from broad-scale geoengineering are currently not
well understood;

(iii) The Wyoming department of environmental
quality is responsible for monitoring air, land and water
quality, including regulating emissions into the air, land
and water within Wyoming to ensure the safety of the public
while planning the development, use, reclamation,
preservation and enhancement of the air, land and water
resources of the state;

(iv) It is the intent of the legislature to
protect the public health and welfare of Wyoming residents
while allowing all authorized activities permitted under
state law.

Section 2. W.S. 35-11-2201 is created to read:

HB0208

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0247
ARTICLE 22
GEOENGINEERING

35-11-2201. Atmospheric engineering prohibited;
testing required; retaliation prohibited.

(a) No person shall intentionally inject, release or
disperse by any means any chemicals, chemical compounds,
apparatus or other substances within Wyoming into the
atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting or
changing temperature, weather or the intensity of the
sunlight.

(b) The department shall test the air quality at
sites subject to geoengineering or upon receiving a report
of a potential violation of subsection (a) of this section.
Testing under this subsection shall, if possible, utilize
transmission electron microscopy and shall determine total
metals concentration in precipitation.

(c) No person or governmental entity shall retaliate
or otherwise harass, discipline or discriminate against any
person because the person reported, in good faith, a
HB0208

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0247
suspected violation of subsection (a) of this section or
provided information related to an investigation of a
suspected violation of subsection (a) of this section.

Section 3. W.S. 35-11-103(a)(xiii) is amended to
read:

35-11-103. Definitions.

(a) For the purpose of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 35-11-101 through
35-11-403, 35-11-405, 35-11-406, 35-11-408 through
35-11-1106, 35-11-1414 through 35-11-1432, 35-11-1601
through 35-11-1613, 35-11-1701, 35-11-1801 through
35-11-1803, 35-11-2001 through 35-11-2004, and 35-11-2101
and 35-11-2201.

Section 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
impair or alter any contract or agreement that is publicly
disclosed or subject to public disclosure and that is
HB0208

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0247
entered into with the state of Wyoming before the effective
date of this act.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0208